Massachusetts, session 194th, H3699.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 6 of Chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following:- 
“Notwithstanding any general or special law or rule to the contrary, the registrar shall 
authorize the registration of a motor vehicle with a single plate attached to the rear, rather than a 
plate on the front as well as the rear, provided that it is a distinctive registration plate as defined 
under section 2F. The registrar may authorize an additional charge of not more than $50 for such 
a plate.”